Massachusetts, session 194th, H4023.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after section 127P, the
following section:-
Section 127Q. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Excess moisture”, the unwanted presence of moisture or water on permeable surfaces in
a residence that occurs on a periodic, chronic or acute basis and presents a risk of mold growth.
“Residence”, a building or structure used for or intended to be used for human habitation
including, but are not limited to: single or multi-unit structures, rooming houses, manufactured
homes, temporary housing, alternative housing and condominiums.
(b) Every owner of a residence shall have a duty to maintain all buildings and structural
elements of the residence are free of excess moisture or mold.
of 2

(c)(1) The department shall annually inspect residences for the existence of excess
moisture or mold. The department shall investigate potential sources of excess moisture or
causes of mold including, but are not limited to: (i) plumbing leaks; (ii) structural defects that
allow moisture to enter; (iii) improperly maintained mechanical or natural ventilation; and (iv)
improperly maintained heating, air conditioning or ventilation ductwork.
(2) Any board of health may adopt rules and regulations for the inspection of excess
moisture or mold in residences located in their city or town that comply with paragraph (1).
(d) The department may inspect a residence for excess moisture or mold if it has been
notified and that there is reasonable evidence that a residence contains excess moisture or mold.
Any board of health in a city or town shall notify the department of a residence with excess
moisture or mold
(e) The department may issue a written order to the owner of the residence where excess
moisture or mold has been found requiring them to put the premises in a clean condition or to
comply with the regulations set forth by the board of health. The order shall be served in the
same manner as is provided for the service of an order by section 124.
(f) Owners of the residence shall be responsible for the payments required to mitigate
excess moisture or mold located in the residence.
(g) The superior court, housing court and district court shall have jurisdiction in equity to
enforce the provisions of this section.
(h) The department shall establish rules and regulations to implement this section.
of 2